District of Columbia statutes.
46-358.01

Grounds for rendition.

(a)

For purposes of this subchapter, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may:

(1)

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in the District with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

(2)

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in the District who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

(c)

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 801, 63 DCR 222